Hawaii statutes.
§26-53 Deputies or assistants to
department heads. Effective July 1, 2004, the salaries of deputies or
assistants to the head of any department of the State, other than the
department of education, shall be within the range or ranges for the specific
positions as last recommended by the executive salary commission. Effective
July 1, 2007, and every six years thereafter, the salaries shall be as last
recommended by the commission on salaries and specified by the appointing
official, if appropriate, pursuant to section 26-56, unless rejected by the
legislature. [L 1965, c 223, pt of §5; Supp, §4A-3; HRS §26-53; am L 1975, c
58, §7; am L 1982, c 129, §1(3); am L 1986, c 128, §1(3); am L 1989, c 329,
§1(3); am L 2003, c 122, §4 and c 187, §2; am L 2006, c 299, §4]

Cross References

Nonapplicability to:

Administrative
services manager of department of attorney general, see §28-7.5.

Special assistant to attorney general, see §28-8.5.

Special assistant to state librarian, see §312-2.2.

Salary of various department of education deputies and
assistants, see §302A-621.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next